Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4976.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 116.07, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 7f. new text end new text begin Financial assurance. new text end new text begin (a) Before the commissioner issues or renews a permit for a feedlot with a capacity of 1,000 or more animal units, the permit applicant must submit to the commissioner proof of financial assurance that satisfies the requirements under this subdivision. Financial assurance must be of an amount sufficient to pay the closure costs determined under paragraph (c) for the feedlot and manure storage area, with all terms and conditions of the financial assurance instrument approved by the commissioner. The commissioner, in evaluating financial assurance, may consult individuals with documented experience in the analysis. The applicant must pay all costs incurred by the commissioner to obtain the analysis. new text end new text begin (b) A permittee must maintain sufficient financial assurance for the duration of the permit and demonstrate to the commissioner's satisfaction that: new text end new text begin (1) money will be available and made payable to the commissioner if the commissioner determines the permittee is not in full compliance with the closure requirements established by the commissioner in rule for feedlots and manure storage areas; new text end new text begin (2) the financial assurance instrument is fully valid, binding, and enforceable under state and federal law; new text end new text begin (3) the financial assurance instrument is not dischargeable through bankruptcy; and new text end new text begin (4) the financial assurance provider will give the commissioner at least 120 days' notice before canceling the financial assurance instrument. new text end new text begin (c) The permit applicant must submit to the commissioner a documented estimate of costs required to implement the closure requirements established by the commissioner in rule for feedlots and manure storage areas. Cost estimates must incorporate current dollar values at the time of the estimate and any additional costs required by the commissioner to oversee and hire a third party to implement the closure requirements. The applicant must not incorporate the estimated salvage or market value of manure, animals, structures, equipment, land, or other assets. The commissioner must evaluate and may modify the applicant's cost estimates and may consult individuals with documented experience in feedlot or manure storage area closure or remediation. The applicant must pay all costs incurred by the commissioner to obtain the consultation. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 116.07, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 7g. new text end new text begin Abandoned manure storage areas. new text end new text begin At least annually, the commissioner must compile a list of abandoned manure storage areas in the state. A list compiled under this subdivision is not a feedlot inventory for purposes of subdivision 7b. For purposes of this subdivision, "abandoned manure storage areas" means solid and liquid manure storage areas that have been previously registered with the state as a feedlot with a manure storage area and have: new text end new text begin (1) permanently ceased operation and are subject to, but not in compliance with, the closure requirements established by the commissioner in rule for feedlots and manure storage areas; or new text end new text begin (2) been unused for at least three years. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin FEEDLOT FINANCIAL ASSURANCE REQUIREMENTS COMPLIANCE SCHEDULE.new text end new text begin The commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency may phase in the new financial assurance requirements under Minnesota Statutes, section 116.07, subdivision 7f, during the next reissuance of the national pollutant discharge elimination system general permit for concentrated animal feeding operations, MNG440000. The commissioner must establish a schedule for permittees to come into compliance with the requirements. The schedule must require 250 permittees per year to comply, beginning with the operations with the largest number of animal units. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin MANURE STORAGE AREA REPORTS REQUIRED.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Reports. new text end new text begin (a) No later than December 15, 2026, the commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency must develop a list based on registration data for each county of potentially abandoned manure storage areas. new text end new text begin (b) No later than January 15, 2028, each delegated county must report to the commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency a list of abandoned manure storage areas located in the county. The report must be submitted by the county feedlot officer. new text end new text begin (c) No later than January 15, 2028, the Pollution Control Agency regional feedlot staff must compile a list of abandoned manure storage areas located in counties under their regulatory jurisdiction that do not have delegation agreements with the agency. new text end new text begin (d) No later than February 15, 2028, the commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency must submit a compilation report and list of abandoned manure storage areas to the legislative committees with jurisdiction over agriculture and environment. The report must include recommendations for remediation. The commissioner must seek advice from the Minnesota Association of County Feedlot Officers and livestock associations for recommendations, including existing and any proposed options for remediation. new text end new text begin (e) For purposes of this section, "abandoned manure storage areas" has the meaning given in Minnesota Statutes, section 116.07, subdivision 7g. new text end new text begin (f) Reports and lists required under this section are not feedlot inventories for purposes of Minnesota Statutes, section 116.07, subdivision 7b. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Delegated counties. new text end new text begin (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b), during the 2028 and 2029 delegation years, the commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency must not penalize a delegated county for a performance issue or shortcoming attributable to the county's reassignment of county feedlot officer resources necessary to comply with the additional requirements imposed upon the county under subdivision 1. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner may penalize a county during the 2028 or 2029 delegation year for a performance issue or shortcoming attributable to the county's reassignment of county feedlot officer resources only if the specific penalty is approved by a majority of the board of the Minnesota Association of County Feedlot Officers. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin General fund. new text end new text begin (a) $500,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency to implement feedlot financial assurance requirements and compile the annual list of abandoned manure storage areas under Minnesota Statutes, section 116.07, subdivisions 7f and 7g. new text end new text begin (b) $700,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency for distribution to delegated counties based on registered feedlots and manure storage areas for inspections of manure storage areas and the abandoned manure storage area reports required under this act. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2028. new text end new text begin (c) $250,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency for a grant to the Minnesota Association of County Feedlot Officers to provide training on state feedlot requirements, working efficiently and effectively with producers, and reducing the incidence of manure or nutrients entering surface water or groundwater. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Environmental fund. new text end new text begin $500,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the environmental fund to the commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency to implement feedlot financial assurance requirements and compile the annual list of abandoned manure storage areas under Minnesota Statutes, section 116.07, subdivisions 7f and 7g. new text end